North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-14 Unfair Discrimination in Purchase of Farm Products [Repealed]

4-14-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, §§ 1, 2; 1939, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 4-1401; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-02.
Unfair discrimination — Exception. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, § 3; 1939, ch. 8, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-1402; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-03.
Different prices in purchase of agricultural products to be prima facie evidence. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, § 4; 1939, ch. 8, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 4-1403; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-04.
Unfair discrimination in sale of farm products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 258, § 1; 1913, ch. 287, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3043; R.C. 1943, § 4-1404; S.L. 1963, ch. 83, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-05.
Complaint of unfair discrimination — Investigation — Prosecution — Duty of agriculture commissioner. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, § 6; 1939, ch. 8, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 4-1405; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-06.
Enforcement of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, §§ 5, 8; 1939, ch. 8, §§ 5, 8; R.C. 1943, § 4-1406; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-07.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, § 7; 1939, ch. 8, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 4-1407; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-08.
Remedies of chapter cumulative. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 3, § 9; 1939, ch. 8, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 4-1408; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-09.
Unfair trade practices in the dairy industry. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 303, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-1409; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-10.
Contracts void — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 303, §§ 2, 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-1410; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14-11.
Enforcement of fair trade practices. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 303, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-1411; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.